Utah statutes.
32A-5-109 (Repealed 07/01/11).    Transition in types of clubs.
(1) (a)  If a club licensee is a class C club licensee as of June 30, 2009, it
renews its license in accordance with Section 32A-5-102, and it continues to
meet the qualifications of a class C club licensee:
(i)  the class C club licensee shall pay a renewal fee of $1,600; and
(ii)  effective July 1, 2009, the class C club licensee is automatically
converted to a dining club licensee.
(b)  If a club licensee is a class D club licensee as of June 30, 2009, it
renews its license in accordance with Section 32A-5-102, and it continues to
meet the qualifications of a class D club licensee:
(i)  the class D club licensee shall pay a renewal fee of $1,600; and
(ii)  effective July 1, 2009, the class D club licensee is automatically
converted to a social club licensee.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a) or (b), if at the time of renewal a
class C club licensee or class D club licensee requests to convert effective
July 1, 2009, to a different type of club license than that provided in
Subsection (1)(a) or (b), the commission may approve a change in the type of
club license in accordance with rules made by the commission.
(2)  A conversion under this section does not require a redetermination of
applicable proximity requirements.
